Arkansas, session 2025, HB1641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-71-101, concerning the definitions that
concern offenses against public health, safety, or welfare, is amended to add
an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(13) "Tracking device" means a device that reveals the location
or movement of the device by the transmission of electronic signals.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-71-208(a), concerning the offense of
harassment, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A person commits the offense of harassment if,:
(1) with With purpose to harass, annoy, or alarm another person,
without good cause, he or she:
(1)(A) Strikes, shoves, kicks, or otherwise touches a
person, subjects that person to offensive physical contact or attempts or
threatens to do so;
(2)(B) In a public place, directs obscene language or
makes an obscene gesture to or at another person in a manner likely to
*CEB068*
03/03/2025 1:02:50 PM CEB068

HB1641
provoke a violent or disorderly response;
(3)(C) Follows a person in or about a public place;
(4)(D) In a public place repeatedly insults, taunts, or
challenges another person in a manner likely to provoke a violent or
disorderly response;
(5)(E) Engages in conduct or repeatedly commits an act
that alarms or seriously annoys another person and that serves no legitimate
purpose; or
(6)(F) Places a person under surveillance by remaining
present outside that person's school, place of employment, vehicle, other
place occupied by that person, or residence, other than the residence of the
defendant, for no purpose other than to harass, alarm, or annoy; or
(2)(A) With the purpose of tracking a person, without good cause
or legal authority, he or she uses a tracking device to determine the
location or movement of a person without the consent of the person.
(B) It is not an offense under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of
this section if a parent or legal guardian of a minor uses a tracking device
to track the location or movement of the minor.


















03/03/2025 1:02:50 PM CEB068